California statutes. Education Code
If any building so excluded was not constructed in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) of this chapter and was not repaired, reconstructed, or replaced in accordance with this article, there shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the building a public notice stating that the building does not meet the structural standards imposed by law for earthquake safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

81161.

It is the intent of the Legislature to re-examine the progress under this article from time to time. To enable it to do so, and to expedite the provision of safe educational facilities for California community college students, the Legislature intends that the governing board of each community college district adopt a plan for the orderly repair, reconstruction, or replacement of school buildings not repaired, reconstructed, or replaced in accordance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81162.

Whenever an examination of the structural condition of any school building of a community college district has been made by the Department of General Services, by any licensed structural engineer or licensed architect for the governing board of the district, or under the authorization of law, and a report of the examination, including the findings and recommendations of the agency or person making the examination, has been made to the governing board of the district, and the report shows that the building is unsafe for use, the governing board of the district immediately shall have prepared an estimate of the cost necessary to make repairs to the building or buildings that are necessary, or, if necessary, to reconstruct or replace the building so that the building when repaired or reconstructed, or any building erected to replace it, shall meet those standards of structural safety that are established in accordance with law. The estimate shall be based on current costs and may include other costs to reflect modern educational needs. Also, an estimate of the cost of replacement based on the standards established by the State Allocation Board for area per student and cost per square foot shall be made and reported.

The report required by this section shall include a statement that each of the buildings examined is safe or unsafe for school use. For the purpose of this statement, the sole consideration shall be protection of life and the prevention of personal injury at a level of safety equivalent to that established by Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder, disregarding, insofar as possible, building damage not jeopardizing life that would be expected from one disturbance of nature of the intensity used for design purposes in those rules and regulations.

The governing board, utilizing the information acquired from the examination and report developed pursuant to this section, shall establish a system of priorities for the repair, reconstruction, or replacement of unsafe school buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 112.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81177.

(a) No member of the governing board of a community college district shall be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that a school building was not constructed under the requirements of Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130), if the governing board complies with this article.

A licensed structural engineer or licensed architect, employed by a governing board to examine any school building under this article, shall not be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property as a result of the structural inadequacy and failure of a building, if he or she has exercised normal professional diligence in carrying out his or her functions under Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and this article.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), nothing in this article shall be construed as relieving any member of the governing board of a community college district of any liability for injury to persons or damage to property imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81179.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 81800), whenever a community college district does not have funds available to repair, reconstruct, or replace the school buildings referred to in this article or Section 16320, the community college district shall apply for the funds as may be necessary to accomplish the repair, reconstruction, or replacement pursuant to Chapter 4. The community college district shall also accept the funds as are disbursed to the district pursuant to Chapter 4, whether or not the funds constitute the maximum amount applied for, and shall repay the funds in accordance with Chapter 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 561.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Disposal of Sites [81190. - 81192.]

81190.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 81360) of Chapter 2 of this part and in addition to the requirements placed upon community college districts pursuant to Section 54222 of the Government Code, the governing board of any community college district may sell, for less than fair market value, any school site that is deemed to be surplus property of the district, to any park district, city, or county in which the community college district is wholly or partially situated for use or partial use as park or recreational purposes or open-space purposes if the governing board adopts a resolution specifying that it will sell or transfer such property for less than fair market value to such an entity for such a purpose. The offer to sell shall be made in writing, but the terms by which the property may be sold or transferred need not be specifically provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

81191.

The sale or transfer may be made for cash and other valuable consideration, or for other valuable consideration, as deemed appropriate by the governing board of the community college district. The sale or transfer may be made without first taking a vote of the electors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

81192.

A community college district’s offer to sell or transfer the land shall be made to all park districts, cities, and counties in which the community college district is wholly or partially situated pursuant to this article and shall remain open for not less than 60 days. The sale or transfer shall be made to whichever public entity first accepts the offer, or whichever public entity can negotiate satisfactorily for the purchase or transfer of such surplus land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Property: Sale, Lease, Use, Gift, and Exchange [81250. - 81563.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [81250. - 81254.]

81250.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may, after a public hearing on the matter, request the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to waive, insofar as necessary to accomplish the purpose of the waiver request, all or part of any section of this chapter, other than any provision of this article, or any regulation adopted by the Board of Governors that implements a provision of this chapter.

(b) If a waiver request involves the sale or lease of
 district real property, the governing board of a district requesting a waiver shall provide written notice of the public hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), at least 30 days prior to the hearing, to any city, county, park or recreation district, regional park authority, or public housing authority within which the land may be situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 657, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

81252.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may approve any request for waiver upon finding that the waiver would promote efficiency and further the public benefit. Waivers may be approved for purposes including, but not necessarily limited to, joint or shared use of property and facilities and for collaborative partnerships between colleges and other public and private entities.

(b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall not approve
 any request for waiver of any provision of this chapter pursuant to Section 81250 unless the district seeking the waiver demonstrates all of the following:

(1) The district has provided the written notice required by subdivision (b) of Section 81250.

(2) The district, after making a good faith effort, was unable to reach agreement with any public agency that sought to acquire the site pursuant to Section 81363.5.

(3) The waiver will not substantially increase state costs or decrease state revenues.

(4) The waiver will further the ability of the district to meet the educational needs of the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 657, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

81254.

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually report to the Governor and Legislature on the number, types, and disposition of waiver requests submitted pursuant to Section 81250 on or before July 1 for the prior year actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 15.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Conveyances [81300. - 81301.]

81300.

The governing board of a community college district shall receive in the name of the district conveyances for all property received and purchased by it, and shall make in the name of the district conveyances of all property belonging to the district and sold by it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81301.

The governing board of a community college district shall have the power to execute and deliver quitclaim deeds, either with or without consideration to the owners of real property adjacent to any real property owned by the district, for the purpose of removing defects in and otherwise clearing up the title to such adjacent real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dedication of Real Property [81310. - 81315.]

81310.

The governing board of a community college district may, pursuant to this article, dedicate or convey to the state, or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, for public street or highway purposes, either with or without consideration and without a vote of the electors of the district first being taken, any real property belonging to the district, either in fee or any lesser estate or interest therein, including abutter’s right of access to any public street or highway; and may dedicate or convey to any public corporation, or private corporation engaged in the public utility business, without a vote of the electors of the district first being taken, an
 easement to lay, construct, reconstruct, maintain, and operate water, sewer, gas, or storm drain pipes or ditches, electric or telephone lines, and access roads used in connection therewith, over and upon any land belonging to the community college district, upon such terms and conditions as the parties thereto may agree.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81311.

Before ordering the dedication or conveyance of any property the governing board shall in regular open meeting by a two-thirds vote of all its members adopt a resolution declaring its intention to dedicate or convey the property. The resolution shall describe the property proposed to be dedicated or conveyed in such manner as to identify it, and shall specify the purposes for which and the terms upon which it will be dedicated or conveyed, and shall fix a time not less than 10 days thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting for a public hearing upon the question of making the dedication or conveyance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81312.

Notice of adoption of the resolution and of the time and place of holding the meeting shall be given by posting copies of the resolution signed by the members of the board, or by a majority thereof, in three public places in the district not less than 10 days before the date of the meeting, and by publishing the notice once not less than five days before the date of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the district, if there is one, or, if there is no such newspaper published in the district, then in a newspaper published in the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated and having a general circulation in the
 district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81313.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing board the public hearing shall be held, and the governing board may at the meeting, or at any other meeting of the governing board held within 60 days thereafter, unless a protest is entered, adopt a resolution by a two-thirds vote of all its members authorizing and directing the president of the governing board, or any other presiding officer, or the secretary, or the members thereof, to execute a deed of dedication or conveyance of the property and to deliver it. Upon the delivery and acceptance of the deed the dedication or conveyance is fully effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81314.

A petition protesting against the proposed dedication or conveyance signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified electors of the district, as shown by the affidavit of one of the petitioners, may be filed with the governing board at the meeting held at the time and place fixed in the resolution. If a protest is filed, the governing board, before taking any further action on the proposed dedication or conveyance, shall submit the question of whether the proposed dedication or conveyance should be made, to the board of governors whose decision is final. If the
 board of governors approves the proposed dedication or conveyance, the governing board may proceed with the dedication or conveyance. If the board of governors does not approve the proposed dedication or conveyance, no further proceedings shall be had thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81315.

Whenever community college districts are required to improve and dedicate real property to the centerline of streets or highways adjacent to a school site or forming an intersection at a school site location, and when such street or highway rights-of-way are being conveyed to the city or county or by the city or county to the community college district, the requirements of this article shall be deemed satisfied solely by posting a notice of intention to convey in an appropriate location before conveyance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Leasing School Buildings [81330. - 81351.]

81330.

Any community college district may enter into leases and agreements relating to real property and buildings to be used by the district pursuant to this article. As used in this article, “building” includes (a) one or more buildings located or to be located on one or more sites; (b) the remodeling of any building located on a site to be leased pursuant to this article; (c) onsite and offsite facilities; utilities or improvements which the governing board determines are necessary for the proper operation or function of the school facilities to be leased. It also includes the permanent improvement of school grounds. As used in this article, “site” includes one or more sites,
 and also may include any building or buildings located or to be located on a site.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81331.

As used in this article “lease or agreement” shall include a lease purchase agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81332.

Before the governing board of a community college district enters into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, it shall have available a site upon which a building to be used by the district may be constructed and shall have complied with the provisions of law relating to the selection and approval of sites, and it shall have prepared and shall have adopted plans and specifications for such building which have been approved pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) of Chapter 1 of Part 49. A district has a site available for the purposes of this section if it owns a site or if it has an option on a site which
 allows the community college district or the designee of the district to purchase the site. Any community college district may acquire and pay for an option containing such a provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

81334.

Sections 81360 to 81378, inclusive, shall not apply to leases made pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81335.

The governing board of a community college district may let, at a minimum rental of one dollar ($1) a year, to any person, firm, or corporation any real property which belongs to the district if the instrument by which such property is let requires the lessee therein to construct on the demised premises, or provide for the construction thereon of, a building or buildings for the use of the community college district during the term thereof, and provides that title to such building shall vest in the community college district at the expiration of such term. Such instrument may provide for the means or methods by which such title shall vest in the community college district
 prior to the expiration of such term, and shall contain such other terms and conditions as the governing board may deem to be in the best interest of the community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81336.

The governing board of a community college district may enter into an agreement with any person, firm, or corporation under which such person, firm, or corporation shall construct, or provide for the construction of, a building to be used by the district upon a designated site and lease such building and site to the district. Such instrument shall provide that the title to such building and site shall vest in the district at the expiration of such lease, and may provide the means or method by which the title to the building and site shall vest in the district prior to the expiration of such lease, and shall contain such other terms and conditions as the governing board of
 the district deems to be in the best interest of the district.

The agreement entered into shall be with the lowest responsible bidder who shall give such security as the board requires. The board may reject all bids. For the purpose of securing bids the board shall publish at least once a week for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such paper, then in some paper of general circulation circulated in the county, a notice calling for bids, stating the proposed terms of the agreement and the time and place where bids will be opened.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81344.

After the governing board of a community college district has complied with Section 81332, it shall, in a regular open meeting, adopt a resolution declaring its intention to enter into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article. The resolution shall describe, in such manner as to identify it, the available site upon which the building to be used by the district shall be constructed, shall generally describe the building to be constructed and state that the building shall be constructed pursuant to the plans and specifications adopted by the governing board therefor, shall, if such is the case, state the minimum yearly rental at which the governing board will lease real
 property belonging to the district upon which the building is to be constructed, and shall state the maximum number of years for which the community college district will lease the building or site and building, as the case may be, and shall state that the proposals submitted therefor shall designate the amount of rental, which shall be annual, semiannual, or monthly, to be paid by the community college district for the use of the building, or building and site, as the case may be. The resolution shall fix a time, not less than three weeks thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting, at which sealed proposals to enter such a lease or agreement with the community college district will be received from any person, firm, or corporation, and considered by the governing board. Notice thereof shall be given in the manner provided in Section 81368.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the
 governing body, all sealed proposals which have been received shall, in public session, be opened, examined, and declared by the board. Of the proposals submitted which conform to all terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intention to enter a lease or agreement and which are made by responsible bidders, the proposal which calls for the lowest rental shall be finally accepted, or the board shall reject all bids. The board is not required to accept a proposal, or else reject all bids, on the same day as that in which the proposals are opened.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81345.

As an alternative to obtaining sealed proposals as required by Sections 81336 and 81344, the governing board, in a public meeting, may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to enter into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article with a nonprofit corporation organized under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of, or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of, Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the nonprofit corporation provide: (1) that no person shall be eligible to serve as a member or
 director of the corporation except a person initially approved by resolution of the governing board of the community college district, and (2) that no part of the net earnings of the corporation shall inure to the benefit of any member, private shareholder, individual, person, firm or corporation excepting only the district. The resolution shall describe, in a manner that identifies it, the available site upon which the building to be used by the district shall be constructed, shall generally describe the building to be constructed and state that the building shall be constructed pursuant to the plans and specifications adopted by the governing board therefor, shall, if such is the case, state the minimum yearly rental at which the governing board will lease real property belonging to the district upon which the building is to be constructed, and shall state the maximum number of years for which the community college district will lease the building, or building and site, as the case may be.

Any building constructed by a nonprofit corporation pursuant to a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be constructed under a contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to Sections 20671 to 20675, inclusive, of the Public Contract Code. Section 81350 of this code shall apply to this contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81346.

Any bonds, notes, warrants or other evidences of indebtedness to be issued by a nonprofit corporation to finance the construction of a building pursuant to a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 81345 shall be sold pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81347.

All such bonds, notes, warrants or other evidences of indebtedness referred to in Section 81346 and the interest thereon are exempt from all taxation in the state other than inheritance, gift and franchise taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81348.

Any building constructed for the use of a community college district pursuant to this article is subject to Sections 81130 to 81144, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81349.

For the purposes of Sections 15102 and 15106, 50 percent of any remaining payments for use of the building or site and building which would become due from the district under any leases and agreements entered into by the district pursuant to this article, if such leases and agreements were to run their full term, shall be considered outstanding bonded indebtedness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81350.

The governing board of the community college district shall obtain the general prevailing rate of per diem wages from the Director of the Department of Industrial Relations for each craft, classification or type of workman needed for the construction of the building and shall specify in the resolution and in the notice, required by Section 81344, or in the resolution required by Section 81345 and in the lease or agreement made pursuant to this article, what the general prevailing rate of per diem wages and the general prevailing rate for holiday and overtime work in the locality is for each craft, classification or type of workmen needed for the construction of the
 building. The holidays upon which such rate shall be paid need not be specified by the governing board, but shall be all holidays recognized in the collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular craft, classification or type of workmen employed on the project.

Any agreement or lease entered into pursuant to this article shall require that such general prevailing rates will be paid. It shall also require that work performed by any workman employed upon the project in excess of eight hours during any one calendar day shall be permitted only upon compensation for all hours worked in excess of eight hours per day at not less than 112 times the basic rate of pay. There may also be included in leases or agreements entered into pursuant to this article any other requirements with respect to matters related to the subject of this section which the governing
 board deems necessary or desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

81351.

The provisions of this article prevail over any provisions of law which conflict therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sale or Lease of Real Property [81360. - 81382.]

81360.

The governing board of a community college district may sell any real property belonging to the district or may lease for a term not exceeding 99 years, any real property, together with any personal property located thereon, belonging to the district which is not or will not be needed by the district for school classroom buildings at the time of delivery of title or possession. The sale or lease may be made without first taking a vote of the electors of the district, and shall be made in the manner provided by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81361.

The governing board of a community college district that has by majority vote established a standard rate or rates for the lease pursuant to this article of its real property may by majority vote delegate to an officer or employee as the governing board may designate, the power to enter into leases, for and in behalf of the district, of any real property of the district, with respect to which real property the district has
 received only one sealed proposal that conforms with the existing standard rate or rates, from a responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (AB 1240)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

81363.

The funds derived from the sale or from a lease with an option to purchase shall be used for capital outlay or deferred maintenance; provided, however, that the proceeds of property sold or leased in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 81363.5 may be deposited in the general fund of the district if, prior to the sale or lease, the community college district governing board has determined that the district has no anticipated need for additional sites or building construction for the five-year period following the sale or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 609, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

81363.5.

Except as provided for in Article 9 (commencing with Section 81190) of Chapter 1, the sale or lease with an option to purchase of real property by a community college district shall be in accordance with the following priorities and procedures.

(a) First, the property shall be offered for park or recreational purposes pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, in any instance in which such article is applicable.

(b) Second, the property shall
 be offered for sale or lease with an option to purchase, at fair market value;

(1) In writing, to the Director of General Services, the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the county and city in which the property is situated, and to any public housing authority in the county in which the property is situated; and

(2) By public notice to any public district, public authority, public agency, public corporation, or any other political subdivision in this state, to the federal government, and to nonprofit charitable corporations existing on December 31, 1979, and organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10200) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code then in effect or organized for charitable purposes on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the
 Corporations Code. Public notice shall consist of at least publishing its intention to dispose of the real property in a newspaper of general circulation within the district, or if there is no such newspaper, then in any newspaper of general circulation that is regularly circulated in the district. The notice shall specify that the property is being made available to all public districts, public authorities, public agencies, and other political subdivisions or public corporations in this state, and to other nonprofit charitable or nonprofit public benefit corporations.

Publication of notice pursuant to this section shall be once each week for three successive weeks. Three publications in a newspaper regularly published once a week or more often, with at least five days intervening between the respective publication dates not counting such publication dates, are sufficient. The written notice required by paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be mailed no later than
 the date of the second published notice.

The entity desiring to purchase or lease the property shall, within 60 days after the third publication of notice, notify the community college district of its intent to purchase or lease the property. If the entity desiring to purchase or lease the property and the district are unable to arrive at a mutually satisfactory price or lease payment during the 60-day period, the property may be disposed of as otherwise provided in this section. In the event the district receives offers from more than one entity pursuant to this subdivision, the school district governing board may, in its discretion, determine which of the offers to accept.

(c) Third, the property may be disposed of in any other manner authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

81364.

Any lease may be made upon such consideration or for such rental, as is authorized by the action of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81365.

Before ordering the sale or lease of any property the governing board, in a regular open meeting, by a two-thirds vote of all its members, shall adopt a resolution, declaring its intention to sell or lease the property, as the case may be. The resolution shall describe the property proposed to be sold or leased in such manner as to identify it and shall specify the minimum price or rental and the terms upon which it will be sold or leased and the commission, or rate thereof, if any, which the board will pay to a licensed real estate broker out of the minimum price or rental. The resolution shall fix a time not less than three weeks thereafter for a public meeting of the
 governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting, at which sealed proposals to purchase or lease will be received and considered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81366.

In lieu of the declaration of intention to lease real property provided in Section 81365, the governing board of a community college district having an average daily attendance of 400,000 or more as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding year may publish a notice three times in a period of not less than 15 days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The notice shall describe the property proposed to be leased in such manner as to identify it and shall specify the minimum rental and terms upon which it will be leased. The notice shall fix a time not less than 15 days thereafter for a public meeting of
 the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting at which proposal to lease will be received and considered.

The governing board by majority vote may adopt a ruling delegating to such officer or employee of the district as the board may designate, authority to perform the duties prescribed in this section.

Bids received under this section shall be received, accepted, or rejected in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81367.

If, in the discretion of the board, it is advisable to offer to pay a commission to a licensed real estate broker who is instrumental in obtaining any proposal, the commission shall be specified in the resolution. No commission shall be paid unless there is contained in or with the sealed proposal that is finally accepted the name of the licensed real estate broker to whom it is to be paid, and the amount or rate thereof. Any
 commission shall, however, be paid only out of money received by the board from the sale or rental of the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.   (AB 1240)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

81368.

Notice of the adoption of the resolution and of the time and place of holding the meeting shall be given by posting copies of the resolution signed by the board or by a majority thereof in three public places in the district, not less than 15 days before the date of the meeting, and by publishing the notice not less than once a week for three successive weeks before the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated, if any such newspaper is published therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81369.

Whenever it is proposed to lease real property and the governing board unanimously determines in the resolution that in its opinion, the monthly rental value of the property does not exceed the sum of fifty dollars ($50), the resolution need not be posted and may, before the date of the meeting, be published in two successive issues of a weekly newspaper or in five successive issues of a daily newspaper. The newspaper in which the notice is published shall be one published in the district and having a general circulation there; or if there is no such newspaper, then one having a general circulation in the district; or if there is no such newspaper, then in one having a
 general circulation in a county in which the district or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81370.

(a) At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing body, all sealed proposals that have been received shall, in public session, be opened, examined, and declared by the board. Except as provided in subdivision (b), of the proposals submitted that conform to all terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intention to sell or to lease and that are made by responsible
 bidders, the sealed proposal that is the highest, after deducting therefrom the commission, if any, to be paid a licensed real estate broker in connection therewith, shall be finally accepted, unless the board rejects all of these bids.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the governing board of any community college district may apply to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for a waiver of the requirement that the governing board accept the highest responsible bid for the sale or lease of real property. The board of governors may grant a waiver pursuant to this subdivision if it determines that the waiver is in the best interests of the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   (AB 1240)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

81371.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the board of governors may authorize the governing board of any community college district within Orange County to enter into a negotiated sale of real property owned by the district if that governing board previously opened the bidding process two or more times to sell the real property and did not accept any bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

81372.
